Utah statutes.
16-10a-806.   Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into two or three groups, with each group containing 1/2 or 1/3 of the total, as near as may be.  In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders' meeting after their election, the terms of directors in the second group expire at the second annual shareholders' meeting after their election, and the terms of directors in the third group, if any, expire at the third annual shareholders' meeting after their election.  Upon the expiration of the initial staggered terms directors shall be elected for terms of two years or three years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

